Utah statutes.
63G-6a-703.   Request for proposals -- Notice -- Contents.

(1)  The request for proposals standard procurement process begins when the division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority issues a request for proposals.

(2)  A request for proposals shall:

(a)  state the period of time during which a proposal will be accepted;

(b)  describe the manner in which a proposal shall be submitted;

(c)  state the place where a proposal shall be submitted;

(d)  include, or incorporate by reference:

(i)  a description of the procurement items sought;

(ii)  a description of the subjective and objective criteria that will be used to evaluate the proposal; and

(iii)  the standard contractual terms and conditions required by the authorized purchasing entity;

(e)  state the relative weight that will be given to each score awarded for the criteria described in Subsection (2)(d)(ii), including cost;

(f)  state the formula that will be used to determine the score awarded for the cost of each proposal;

(g)  if the request for proposals will be conducted in multiple stages, as described in Section 63G-6a-710, include a description of the stages and the criteria and scoring that will be used to screen offerors at each stage; and

(h)  state that discussions may be conducted with offerors who submit proposals determined to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award, followed by an opportunity to make best and final offers, but that proposals may be accepted without discussions.

(3)  The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority shall publish a request for proposals in accordance with the requirements of Section 63G-6a-406.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

